Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.18.040

Service of process.

In any action in law or equity commenced by the obligor or obligors, it, his, her, or their assignee or assignees against the said nonadmitted organizations on the said notes secured by said real estate mortgages purchased by said nonadmitted organizations, service of all legal process may be made in accordance with RCW 23.95.450.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2146; 1989 c 165 s 194.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.